North Carolina, session 2025, SB655.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 1E of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Chapter 1E.
"Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians.Indians and Catawba Indian Nation.
"Article 1.
"Full Faith and Credit.
"§ 1E-1. Full faith and credit.
(a) The courts of this State shall give full faith and credit to a judgment, decree, or order
signed by a judicial officer of either (i) the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians or (ii) Catawba
Indian Nation and filed in the Cherokee Tribal Courts or Catawba Nation Tribal Courts to the
same extent as is given a judgment, decree, or order of another state, subject to the provisions of
subsections (b) and (c) of this section; provided that the judgments, decrees, and orders of the
courts of this State are given full faith and credit by the Tribal Courts of the Eastern Band of
Cherokee Indians.Indians and the Tribal Courts of the Catawba Indian Nation.
(b) Judgments, decrees, and orders specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be
given full faith and credit subject to the provisions of G.S. 1C-1705 and G.S. 1C-1708 and shall
be considered a foreign judgment for purposes of these statutes.
(c) Any limited driving privilege signed and issued by a Judge or Justice of either the
Cherokee Tribal Courts or Catawba Nation Tribal Courts in accordance with the applicable
provisions of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes and filed in the Cherokee Tribal Courts Clerk's
Office or Catawba Nation Tribal Courts Clerk's Office shall be valid and given full faith and
credit as specified in subsection (a) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, any reference
to the issuing "judge" or "court" in the applicable provisions of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes
shall be construed to mean the appropriate Judge or Justice in the Cherokee Tribal Courts or
Courts, Catawba Nation Tribal Courts, or the appropriate Cherokee or Catawba Tribal Court.
"§ 1E-2. County services.
A county is not compelled to provide services on lands held in trust by the United States for
the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians, except for public health or human services traditionally
provided by county agencies and not otherwise assumed by the Eastern Band of Cherokee
Indians, unless there is an agreement between the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians and the
county describing each party's responsibilities. The agreement must be approved and signed by
the Principal Chief of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians on behalf of the Eastern Band of
Cherokee Indians and must be signed by the county manager or delegated department head. The
agreement may be effective for a definite period of time or an indefinite period of time, as
specified in the agreement.
"Article 2.
"Tribal Law Enforcement Authority.
"§ 1E-10. Tribal law enforcement.
*S655-v-5*

(a) Except for the sections listed in subsection (b) of this section, Article 13 of Chapter
160A of the General Statutes is applicable to the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians.Indians and
Catawba Indian Nation.
(b) The following provisions of Article 13 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes shall
not apply to the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians:Indians and Catawba Indian Nation:
(1) G.S. 160A-283.
(2) G.S. 160A-286.
(3) G.S. 160A-287.
(4) G.S. 160A-289.1.
"§ 1E-11. Application and meaning of terms.
For purposes of the application of the applicable provisions of Article 13 of Chapter 160A of
the General Statutes, the following terms contained in Article 13 of Chapter 160A of the General
Statutes shall be construed as follows:
(1) City. – To mean the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians.Indians and Catawba
Indian Nation.
(2) Council or governing body. – To mean the Tribal Council of the Eastern Band
of Cherokee Indians.Indians and the Executive Committee of the Catawba
Indian Nation.
(3) City clerk. – To mean the clerk of the Tribal Council of the Eastern Band of
the Cherokee Indians.Indians or of the Executive Committee of the Catawba
Indian Nation.
(4) Corporate limits of the city. – To mean the boundaries of the trust lands of the
Eastern Band of the Cherokee Indians or of the Catawba Indian Nation
wherever located within the State of North Carolina.
(5) Law enforcement agency or local law enforcement agency. – To include the
Cherokee Police Department, the Cherokee Marshals Service, the Tribal
Alcohol Law Enforcement Division of the Eastern Band of the Cherokee
Indians, and the Natural Resources Enforcement Agency of the Eastern Band
of Cherokee Indians.Indians, the Catawba Indian Nation Tribal Police
Department, and the Catawba Indian Nation Marshals Service.
"§ 1E-12. Qualification of law enforcement officers; limitations of authority.
(a) For purposes of this section, "law enforcement officer" means any person appointed
or employed as (i) Chief of Police of the Cherokee Police Department, Chief of the Cherokee
Marshals Service, Chief of the Tribal Alcohol Law Enforcement Division of the Eastern Band of
the Cherokee Indians, or Chief of the Natural Resources Enforcement Agency of the Eastern
Band of the Cherokee Indians or Indians, (ii) a police officer, auxiliary police officer, marshal,
alcohol law enforcement agent, reserve alcohol law enforcement agent, or resources officer with
the Cherokee Police Department, the Cherokee Marshals Service, the Tribal Alcohol Law
Enforcement Division of the Eastern Band of the Cherokee Indians, or the Natural Resources
Enforcement Agency of the Eastern Band of the Cherokee Indians.Indians, (iii) the Chief of the
Catawba Indian Nation Tribal Police Department, or (iv) a police officer, marshal, auxiliary
police, or resources officer with the Catawba Indian Nation Tribal Police Department or Catawba
Indian Nation Marshals Service.
(b) A law enforcement officer shall, prior to the exercise of the officer's authority
pursuant to Article 13 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, comply with the provisions of
Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes and any rules or regulations adopted pursuant
to the authority of Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes. The courts of this State shall
have the jurisdiction pursuant to G.S. 17C-11 to enjoin the Cherokee Police Department, the
Cherokee Marshals Service, the Tribal Alcohol Law Enforcement Division of the Eastern Band
of Cherokee Indians, the Natural Resources Enforcement Agency of the Eastern Band of the
Cherokee Indians, the Catawba Indian Nation Tribal Police Department, Marshals of the
Page 2 Session Law 2025-57 Senate Bill 655

Catawba Indian Nation, or any law enforcement officer or agent employed or appointed by the
department, agency, or division from exercising any or all of the authority under color of State
law conferred by Article 13 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes if any law enforcement
officer or agent of the department, agency, or division fails to meet the required standards
established pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes.
(c) The jurisdiction of a Cherokee law enforcement officer shall be (i) on all property
owned by or leased to the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians located within the trust lands of the
Eastern Band of the Cherokee Indians and (ii) during the immediate and continuous flight of an
offender in accordance with G.S. 15A-402(d). The jurisdiction of a Catawba law enforcement
officer shall be (i) on all property owned by or leased to the Catawba Indian Nation located within
the trust lands of the Catawba Indian Nation and (ii) during the immediate and continuous flight
of an offender in accordance with G.S. 15A-402(d). Neither Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians
nor Catawba Indian Nation law enforcement officers shall have jurisdiction on the other's land
absent separate agreement of the tribes.
(d) Service as a law enforcement officer shall constitute service as (i) a "criminal justice
officer" as defined in G.S. 17C-2(c) and (ii) a "law enforcement officer" for purposes of Article
12E of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. For purposes of Article 12E of Chapter 143 of the
General Statutes, the term "employer," as defined in G.S. 143-166.50, shall be construed to
include the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians and Catawba Indian Nation with respect to law
enforcement officers.
(e) A law enforcement officer may be enjoined from exercising his authority under color
of State law pursuant to Article 13 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes for the reasons set
forth in G.S. 128-16 and pursuant to the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 128 of the General
Statutes.
(f) Nothing contained in this Chapter or in Article 13 of Chapter 160A of the General
Statutes shall be construed as doing any of the following:
(1) Limiting or revoking the authority of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians,
the Cherokee Police Department, the Cherokee Marshals Service, the Tribal
Alcohol Law Enforcement Division of the Eastern Band of the Cherokee
Indians, the Natural Resources Enforcement Agency of the Eastern Band of
the Cherokee Indians, or any law enforcement officers or other persons
appointed or employed by those entities, in the exercise of their inherent
powers of self-government, or exercise of authority conferred by federal law,
regulation, or common law.
(1a) Limiting or revoking the authority of the Catawba Indian Nation, the Catawba
Indian Nation Tribal Police Department, Catawba Indian Nation Marshals
Service, or a police officer, auxiliary police, or resources officer with the
Catawba Indian Nation Tribal Police Department or any of the Catawba
Nation Tribal Police Department, or any law enforcement officers or other
persons appointed or employed by those entities, in the exercise of their
inherent powers of self-government, or exercise of authority conferred by
federal law, regulation, or common law.
(2) Modifying, either by way of enlargement or limitation, the jurisdiction of the
Cherokee Tribal Courts.
(3) Waiving any sovereign immunity that may otherwise apply.
(g) Nothing contained in this Chapter shall be construed as modifying, either by way of
enlargement or limitation, the jurisdiction or authority of any federal, State, or local law
enforcement agency, governmental entity, or any of their officers or employees, except the
Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians, the Catawba Indian Nation, the Cherokee Police Department,
the Catawba Indian Nation Tribal Police Department, the Cherokee Marshals Service, the
Marshals of the Catawba Indian Nation, the Tribal Alcohol Law Enforcement Division of the
Senate Bill 655 Session Law 2025-57 Page 3

Eastern Band of the Cherokee Indians, the Natural Resources Enforcement Agency of the Eastern
Band of the Cherokee Indians, and their law enforcement officers, agents, and employees to the
extent set forth in this Chapter.
"Article 3.
"Probation and Parole.
"§ 1E-20. Cherokee and Catawba Marshals Service.Services.
(a) The Supreme Court of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians is authorized to establish
a probation and parole agency known as the "Cherokee Marshals Service."
(b) Marshals of the Cherokee Marshals Service shall (i) be required to meet the standards
set forth in G.S. 1E-12 for law enforcement officers and (ii) have the same territorial jurisdiction,
powers, and immunities as a law enforcement officer under G.S. 1E-12.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, marshals of the Cherokee Marshals
Service shall have access to all probation and parole records of the North Carolina Department
of Public Safety to the same extent as a probation or post-release supervision officer of the
Department for any person over which the Cherokee Tribal Courts have jurisdiction to proceed
in a criminal case and impose a sentence, including a fine, community service, or imprisonment.
The Department may enter into a memorandum of understanding addressing the specifics of
transferring information to the Cherokee Tribal Courts.
(d) The Catawba Indian Nation is authorized to establish a probation and parole agency.
(e) Marshals of the Catawba Indian Nation shall (i) be required to meet the standards set
forth in G.S. 1E-12 for law enforcement officers and (ii) have the same territorial jurisdiction,
powers, and immunities as a law enforcement officer under G.S. 1E-12.
(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Marshals of the Catawba Indian Nation
shall have access to all probation and parole records of the North Carolina Department of Public
Safety to the same extent as a probation or post-release supervision officer of the Department for
any person with the Catawba Nation Tribal Courts have jurisdiction to proceed in a criminal case
and impose a sentence, including a fine, community service, or imprisonment. The Department
may enter into a memorandum of understanding addressing the specifics of transferring
information to the Catawba Nation Tribal Courts."
SECTION 2. G.S. 7A-343 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-343. Duties of Director.
The Director is the Administrative Officer of the Courts, and the Director's duties include all
of the following:
…
(13) Prescribe policies and procedures and establish and operate systems for the
exchange of criminal and civil information from and to the Judicial
Department and local, State, and federal governments and the Eastern Band
of Cherokee Indians.Indians and Catawba Indian Nation.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 7A-343.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-343.1. Distribution of copies of the appellate division reports.
(a) The Administrative Officer of the Courts shall, upon request and at the State's
expense, distribute such number of copies of the appellate division reports to federal, State
departments and agencies, and to educational institutions of instruction, as follows:
Attorney General 5
Utilities Commission 1
Industrial Commission 1
Office of Administrative Hearings 2
Archives and History, Division of 1
Legislative Building Library 2
Justices of the Supreme Court 1 ea.
Page 4 Session Law 2025-57 Senate Bill 655

Judges of the Court of Appeals 1 ea.
Judges of the Superior Court 1 ea.
Clerks of the Superior Court 1 ea.
District Attorneys 1 ea.
Supreme Court of North Carolina Library AS MANY AS
REQUESTED
Appellate Division Reporter 1
University of North Carolina School of Law 5
North Carolina Central University School of Law 5
Duke University School of Law 5
Wake Forest University School of Law 5
Elon University School of Law 5
Campbell University School of Law 5
United States Department of Justice 1
Library of Congress 1
Federal Judges resident in North Carolina 1 ea.
Librarian, Supreme Court of the United States 1
United States Attorneys resident in North Carolina 1 ea.
Supreme Court Library exchange list 1
Cherokee Supreme Court, Eastern Band of
Cherokee Indians 3
Catawba Nation Tribal Courts 3
The copies of reports furnished to each justice of the Supreme Court and judge of the Court
of Appeals as set out in the table above may be retained personally by the justice or judge.
(b) A recipient listed in subsection (a) of this section may choose not to receive its copies
of the appellate division reports, or choose to receive fewer than the number of copies allotted to
it, by notifying the Administrative Officer of the Courts in writing. Should the recipient again
wish to receive its full allotment of the appellate division reports, the recipient shall notify the
Administrative Officer of the Courts in writing, and the Administrative Officer of the Courts
may, in his or her discretion, resume distribution to the recipient."
SECTION 4. G.S. 14-159.12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-159.12. First degree trespass.
(a) Offense. – A person commits the offense of first degree trespass if, without
authorization, the person enters or remains on or in any of the following:
(1) The premises of another so enclosed or secured as to demonstrate clearly an
intent to keep out intruders.
(2) The building of another.
(3) The lands of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians after the person has been
excluded by a resolution passed by the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indian
Tribal Council.
(4) The lands of the Catawba Indian Nation after the person has been excluded by
resolution passed by the Catawba Indian Nation Executive Committee.
…."
SECTION 5. G.S. 115D-5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-5. Administration of institutions by State Board of Community Colleges;
personnel exempt from North Carolina Human Resources Act; extension
courses; tuition waiver; in-plant training; contracting, etc., for establishment
and operation of extension units of the community college system; use of existing
public school facilities.
…
Senate Bill 655 Session Law 2025-57 Page 5

(b) In order to make instruction as accessible as possible to all citizens, the teaching of
curricular courses and of noncurricular extension courses at convenient locations away from
institution campuses as well as on campuses is authorized and shall be encouraged. A pro rata
portion of the established regular tuition rate charged a full-time student shall be charged a
part-time student taking any curriculum course. In lieu of any tuition charge, the State Board of
Community Colleges shall establish a uniform registration fee, or a schedule of uniform
registration fees, to be charged students enrolling in extension courses for which instruction is
financed primarily from State funds. The State Board of Community Colleges may provide by
general and uniform regulations for waiver of tuition and registration fees for the following:
(1) Persons not enrolled in elementary or secondary schools taking courses
leading to a high school diploma or equivalent certificate.
(2) Courses requested by the following entities that support the organizations'
training needs and are on a specialized course list approved by the State Board
of Community Colleges:
a. Volunteer fire departments.
b. Municipal, county, or State fire departments.
c. Volunteer EMS or rescue and lifesaving departments.
d. Municipal, county, or State EMS or rescue and lifesaving departments.
d1. Law enforcement, fire, EMS or rescue and lifesaving entities serving
a lake authority that was created by a county board of commissioners
prior to July 1, 2012.
e. Radio Emergency Associated Communications Teams (REACT)
under contract to a county as an emergency response agency.
f. Municipal, county, or State law enforcement agencies.
f1. Campus police agencies of private institutions of higher education
certified by the Attorney General pursuant to Chapter 74G of the
General Statutes.
g. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and the
Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for the
training of full-time custodial employees and employees of the
Divisions required to be certified under Article 1 of Chapter 17C of
the General Statutes and the rules of the Criminal Justice and Training
Standards Commission.
h. Repealed by Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhh), effective December
1, 2017.
i. The Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians and the Catawba Indian Nation
law enforcement, fire, EMS or rescue and lifesaving tribal government
departments or programs.
j. The Criminal Justice Standards Division of the Department of Justice
for the training of criminal justice professionals, as defined in
G.S. 17C-20(6), who are required to be certified under (i) Article 1 of
Chapter 17C of the General Statutes and the rules of the North
Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards
Commission or (ii) Chapter 17E of the General Statutes and the rules
of the North Carolina Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards
Commission. The waivers provided for in this sub-subdivision apply
to participants and recent graduates of the North Carolina Criminal
Justice Fellows Program to obtain certifications for eligible criminal
justice professions as defined in G.S. 17C-20(6).
…."
Page 6 Session Law 2025-57 Senate Bill 655

SECTION 6. Nothing in this act shall be deemed to invalidate any agreement
between a county and the Catawba Indian Nation existing as of the effective date of this act.
SECTION 7. Section 4 of this act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies
to offenses committed on or after that date. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 9:19 a.m. this 3rd day of July, 2025
Senate Bill 655 Session Law 2025-57 Page 7